Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1121.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 758. (1) Unless otherwise provided by contract with the local community mental health services program, each licensed hospital shall appoint a recipient rights advisory committee. At least Not less than 1/3 of the membership shall of the recipient rights advisory committee must be primary consumers or family members and, of that 1/3, at least not less than 1/2 shall must be primary consumers. An individual who is any of the following is prohibited from serving on a recipient rights advisory committee: (a) A current or former board member of a licensed hospital. (b) A family member of a current or former board member of a licensed hospital. (2) The recipient rights advisory committee shall do all of the following: (a) Meet at least not less than semiannually or as necessary to carry out its the recipient rights advisory committee's responsibilities. (b) Maintain a current list of members' names and a separate list of categories represented, to be made available to individuals upon on request. (c) Protect the office of recipient rights from pressures that could interfere with the impartial, even-handed, and thorough performance of its the office of recipient rights' functions. (d) Review and provide comments on the report submitted by the hospital director to the governing board of the licensed hospital under section 755. (e) Serve in an advisory capacity to the hospital director and the director of the office of recipient rights. (3) Each member of a recipient rights advisory committee shall complete an annual recipient rights training provided by the office of recipient rights.